North Carolina, session 2025, SB649.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-302.10 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, State Board of Education policy TCP-A-006, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013, shall be
used to determine (i) whether teachers and instructional support personnel are paid on the "M"
salary schedule and (ii) whether they receive a salary supplement for academic preparation at the
six-year or doctoral degree level.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to reinstate education-based salary supplements for teachers and
instructional support personnel in accordance with this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S649-v-1*